Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5141XS (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2059 Section 1. Section 70A.28, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 9. For purposes of this section , âstate employeeâ and 3 âemployeeâ include , but are not limited to , persons employed 4 by the general assembly , and persons employed by the state 5 board of regents , and officers appointed to positions in the 6 executive branch of state government . 7